Washington statutes.
RCW 10.37.140

Perjury—Subornation of perjury—Description of matter.

In an indictment or information for perjury, or subornation of perjury, it is sufficient to set forth the substance of the controversy or matter in respect to which the crime was committed, and in what court or before whom the oath alleged to be false was taken, and that the court or person before whom it was taken had authority to administer it, with proper allegations of the falsity of the matter on which the perjury is assigned; but the indictment or information need not set forth the pleadings, record or proceedings with which the oath is connected, nor the commission or authority of the court or person before whom the perjury was committed.

[ 1891 c 28 s 36; Code 1881 s 1021; 1873 p 228 s 204; 1869 p 243 s 199; 1854 p 112 s 67; RRS s 2072.]

NOTES:

Perjury: Chapter 9A.72 RCW.